Maryland, session 2026, SB0011.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
15–102.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Fund” means the Fair Campaign Financing Fund.
15–107.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0011*

SENATE BILL 11
(a) (1) In accordance with subsection (c) of this section and regulations
adopted by the State Board, the State Board shall authorize distribution of money in the
Fund on a continuing basis on certification that the qualifications under § 15–104 of this
title have been met.
(2) Distributions shall begin not earlier than [January] JULY 1 of the year
[of] BEFORE the election.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.